Utah statutes.
4-32-17.   Quarantine authorized -- Conditions giving rise to quarantine.

(1)  Any meat or poultry product, or any dead, dying, disabled, or diseased animal that is being transported or is held for sale in this state, and that:

(a)  is or has been prepared, sold, transported, or otherwise distributed or offered or received for distribution in violation of this chapter;

(b)  is capable of use as human food and is adulterated or misbranded; or

(c)  in any other way violates this chapter, shall be seized and quarantined.

(2)  Quarantined animals or products shall be condemned and destroyed, except that the owner of the quarantined animals or products may request a hearing within five days, and the commissioner shall, within five days after the request, conduct a hearing to decide whether the quarantined animals or products shall be condemned.

(3)  The commissioner's decision under Subsection (2) is final, and all condemned animals or products shall forthwith be destroyed or denatured in the presence of the commissioner or an inspector.

(4)  This section does not limit the authority for condemnation or seizure conferred by other provisions of this chapter, or other laws.

